Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2263.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XVI-BELECTION FELLOWSHIP PILOT PROGRAMSection 1601-B. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:1234567891011121314151617181920212223 "Department." The Department of State of the Commonwealth."Eligible individual." An individual who meets the eligibility requirements under section 1607-B."Participating county." A county selected by the department under section 1604-B(1) to participate in the pilot program."Pilot program." The Election Fellowship Pilot Program established under section 1602-B.Section 1602-B. Establishment.The Election Fellowship Pilot Program is established within the department to provide eligible individuals experience in the management and administration of elections.Section 1603-B. Implementation and administration.The department and participating counties shall implement and administer the pilot program, subject to the availability of money for the pilot program.Section 1604-B. Duties of department.In implementing and administering the pilot program, the department shall:(1) Randomly select the following counties to participate in the pilot program:(i) Two counties of the third class.(ii) Two counties of the fourth class.(iii) Two counties of the fifth class.(iv) Two counties of the sixth class.(v) Two counties of the seventh class.(vi) Two counties of the eighth class.(2) Establish a process for an eligible individual to apply for and participate in the pilot program.(3) Collaborate with participating counties to determine the duties of eligible individuals selected to participate in 20260HB2263PN2961 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the pilot program.(4) Ensure that eligible individuals selected to participate in the pilot program receive experience in the management and administration of elections through participation in the pilot program.(5) Adopt policies and procedures and establish forms as necessary to implement and administer the pilot program.Section 1605-B. Duties of participating counties.In implementing and administering the pilot program, a participating county shall:(1) Recruit and select eligible individuals to participate in the pilot program by selecting the individuals to work in the county board of elections office from August 1 through December 30 of each year that the pilot program is in operation, beginning August 1 of the year following the effective date of this paragraph.(2) Collaborate with the department to determine the duties of eligible individuals selected to participate in the pilot program.(3) Adopt policies and procedures and establish forms as necessary to implement and administer the pilot program.Section 1606-B. Compensation.A participating county may compensate an eligible individual for participation in the pilot program, with the amount of compensation determined by the participating county.Section 1607-B. Eligibility.An individual shall be eligible to participate in the pilot program if the individual is a resident of this Commonwealth and will be 18 years of age or older on the starting date of participation in the pilot program.20260HB2263PN2961 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 1608-B. Appropriation.The General Assembly shall appropriate money to:(1) The department from the General Fund for the implementation and administration of the pilot program.(2) A participating county from the General Fund for the implementation and administration of the pilot program, including for the compensation of an eligible individual in accordance with section 1606-B.Section 1609-B. Operations.(a) Commencement.--The pilot program shall commence operations on August 1 of the year after the General Assembly appropriates money to the department for the implementation and administration of the pilot program.(b) Conclusion.--The pilot program shall conclude operations three years after the date of commencement of its operations.Section 1610-B. Reporting.(a) Issuance.--No later than 90 days after the pilot program concludes its operations, the department shall collaborate with participating counties to issue a report evaluating the outcomes of the pilot program, including recommendations regarding whether the pilot program should continue and be expanded throughout this Commonwealth.(b) Submittal.--The department shall submit the report under this section to all of the following:(1) The Governor.(2) The President pro tempore of the Senate.(3) The Speaker of the House of Representatives.(4) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the State Government Committee of the Senate.(5) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the 20260HB2263PN2961 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 State Government Committee of the House of Representatives.(c) Posting.--The department shall post the report under this section on its publicly accessible Internet website.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2263PN2961 - 5 - 1234